Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202672-804
New state building; code requirements.

(1) Any new state building shall meet or exceed the requirements of the 2018 International Energy Conservation Code published by the International Code Council. For purposes of this subsection, new state building does not include any building that (a) is constructed or repaired using state funds received in the form of a grant or loan from the state and (b) will not be owned or managed by the state upon the completion of such construction or repair.

(2) Any new lighting, heating, cooling, ventilating, or water heating equipment or controls in a state-owned building and any new building envelope components installed in a state-owned building shall meet or exceed the requirements of the 2018 International Energy Conservation Code.

(3) The State Building Administrator of the Department of Administrative Services, in consultation with the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment, may specify:

(a) A more recent edition of the International Energy Conservation Code;

(b) Additional energy efficiency or renewable energy requirements for buildings; and

(c) Waivers of specific requirements which are demonstrated through life-cycle cost analysis to not be in the state's best interest. The agency receiving the funding shall be required to provide a life-cycle cost analysis to the State Building Administrator.

Laws 1999, LB 755, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 643, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 888, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB329, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 92;

Laws 2019, LB405, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 383;

Laws 2026, LB768, § 9.
July 18, 2026